Utah statutes.
63G-6-801.   Protest to chief procurement officer -- Time -- Authority to resolve protest.

(1)  Any actual or prospective bidder, offeror, or contractor who is aggrieved in connection with the solicitation or award of a contract may protest to the chief procurement officer or the head of a purchasing agency.  A protest with respect to an invitation for bids or a request for proposals shall be submitted in writing prior to the opening of bids or the closing date for proposals, unless the aggrieved person did not know and should not have known of the facts giving rise to the protest prior to bid opening or the closing date for proposals.  The protest shall be submitted in writing within five working days after the aggrieved person knows or should have known of the facts giving rise thereto.

(2)  The chief procurement officer, the head of a purchasing agency, or a designee of either officer shall have the authority, prior to the commencement of an action in court concerning the controversy, to settle and resolve the protest.

